Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1848XS (3) 91 cm/jh S.F. 349 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 619A.1 Discovery deadlines ââ 1 enforcement. 2 1. The court shall not grant an extension for or waive 3 any deadline provided in Iowa rules of civil procedure 1.500 4 through 1.517 unless the extension for, or waiver of, the 5 deadline is mutually agreed upon by all parties. 6 2. If a party fails to comply with a deadline provided 7 in Iowa rules of civil procedure 1.500 through 1.517, or the 8 extension of a deadline mutually agreed upon by all parties, 9 the court shall do all of the following: 10 a. Assess a civil penalty against the party for each 11 violation. In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the 12 court shall consider the severity of the violation, the delay 13 and disruption to the civil proceeding caused by the violation, 14 and whether the party has previously failed to comply with a 15 deadline provided for in Iowa rules of civil procedure 1.500 16 through 1.517 or a deadline extended by mutual agreement. 17 b. If the nonoffending party would customarily file a motion 18 to compel to enforce the missed deadline, regardless of whether 19 the nonoffending party does file a motion to compel, award 20 reasonable attorney fees to the nonoffending party relating to 21 the amount the nonoffending party spent, or would have spent, 22 to file a motion to compel. 23 3. The court shall not waive civil penalties or the award of 24 attorney fees under this section. 25 4. Civil penalties and attorney fees shall be in addition 26 to any other remedy provided under the Iowa rules of civil 27 procedure or law. 28